Idaho, session 2025, H0148.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 63, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6303, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6303. PRIVATE COUNSEL OR ATTORNEY GENERAL. (1) For the purposes of
this section:
(a) "Council" means the constitutional defense council created in sec-
tion 67-6301, Idaho Code.
(b) "Petitioner" means any Idaho citizen who is or was in a legal pro-
ceeding brought by the federal government concerning grazing or water
rights.
(2)(a) A petitioner may request the state of Idaho to provide assis-
tance with or to participate in a legal proceeding by submitting a writ-
ten request to the council that shall include:
(i) A detailed explanation as to why state assistance or partic-
ipation would be appropriate and what the interest of the state
would be;
(ii) A synopsis of the nature of the case and the procedural time-
line or the court's decision; and
(iii) Such other information as the council may require.
(b) Such assistance or participation may include:
(i) Funding private counsel from the constitutional defense
council fund created in section 67-6301, Idaho Code;
(ii) Reimbursing attorney's fees if the petitioner requested a
court to award fees but was denied. Reimbursement shall come from
the constitutional defense council fund;
(iii) The office of the attorney general providing legal assis-
tance or representation to the petitioner; or
(iv) State intervention.
(3)(a) Within thirty (30) days of receiving a petition, the council
shall deliver its decision to the petitioner in writing.
(b) In determining whether to grant, deny, or partially grant or deny a
petition, the council shall consider:
(i) The societal importance of the vindicated right;
(ii) The necessity for private enforcement and accompanying bur-
den on the petitioner;


(iii) Whether a significant amount of Idaho citizens stand to ben-
efit from the court decision;
(iv) Whether the public interest would be served by state assis-
tance or participation in the case; and
(v) Whether state resources, including personnel time and funds,
are available.
(c) The council may provide assistance with or participate in the le-
gal action if the council determines, in its sole discretion, that state
assistance or participation would serve the public interest, that the
legal action has or will be more than likely to restore, maintain, and
advance the state of Idaho's sovereignty and authority over issues that
affect the state and the well-being of its citizens, and that state re-
sources are available.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.